Oregon, session 2026R1, HB4001.
Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. The Department of Justice shall study ways the state may address unlawful
immigration enforcement activity. The department shall submit a report in the manner
provided by ORS 192.245, and may include recommendations for legislation, to the interim
committees of the Legislative Assembly related to the judiciary no later than September 15,
2027.
SECTION 2. Section 1 of this 2026 Act is repealed on January 2, 2028.

NOTE: Matter in boldfaced type in an amended section is new; matter [italic and bracketed] is existing law to be omitted.
New sections are in boldfaced type.
LC 303